Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2306
Board; voting members; expenses.

All voting members of the board shall be entitled to expenses as provided for in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 while attending meetings of the board or while engaged in the performance of official responsibilities as determined by the board.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 6, p. 61;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 25;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 4.